North Dakota, session 69, SB2009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, to the state fair association for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the
state fair association, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Premiums $642,833 $0 $642,833
Campground rest facility 0 750,000 750,000
Safety and security infrastructure 0 800,000 800,000
Total all funds $642,833 $1,550,000 $2,192,833
Less other funds 0 1,550,000 1,550,000
Total general fund $642,833 $0 $642,833
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total
Campground rest facility $0 $750,000 $750,000
Safety and security infrastructure 0 800,000 800,000
Total $0 $1,550,000 $1,550,000
SECTION 3. OTHER FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND. The
other funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $1,550,000 from the strategic
investment and improvements fund for a campground rest facility and for safety and security
infrastructure.
SECTION 4. CAMPGROUND REST FACILITY FUNDING - DISTRIBUTION. Funding provided for
the campground rest facility in section 1 of this Act is to provide a cost-share, not to exceed $750,000.
The cost-share provides $2 of state funding for each $1 of state fair funds.
SECTION 5. REPEAL. Section 4.1-45-22.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.
SECTION 6. EMERGENCY. The sum of $1,550,000 provided for the campground rest facility and
the safety and security infrastructure in section 1 of this Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2009 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2009 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 3 Absent 0
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 76 Nays 14 Absent 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State